District of Columbia statutes.
31-3509

Reserves.

(a)

Taking into consideration the nature of the policies issued by the corporation, a corporation shall establish and maintain pro rata gross unearned premium reserves, reserves for incurred but unpaid claims (both reported and unreported), reserves for expenses related to settlement of such claims, and other reserves as required for proper reporting of its financial condition or as required under the form of financial statements required of the corporation.

(b)

The reserves required under subsection (a) of this section constitute a liability of the corporation in a determination of its financial condition.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-245, § 10, 44 DCR 1158
This section is referenced in § 31-3501.
1981 Ed., § 35-4709.